apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__сказан/ы">
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/і"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/ага"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__люб/лю">
      <e><p><l>лю</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іш</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__люб/ім">
        <e><p><l>iм</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iце</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>яць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__да/ём">
        <e><p><l>ём</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>яце</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>юць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__чака/ем">
        <e><p><l>ем</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>еце</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>юць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__гляд/жу">
        <e><p><l>жу</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>зішь</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>зіць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__гляд/зім">
        <e><p><l>дзім</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>еце</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>яць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__адка/жу">
        <e><p><l>жу</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>жаш</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>жа</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__адка/жам">
        <e><p><l>жам</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>жаце</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>жуць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__бач/у">
        <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ыш</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ыць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__бач/ым">
        <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ыце</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>аць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__хава/юся">
        <e><p><l>юся</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ешся</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ецца</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__хава/емся">
        <e><p><l>емся</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ецеся</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>юцца</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__я/дзім">
        <e><p><l>дзім</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>сце</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>дуць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__і/ду">
        <e><p><l>ду</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>дзеш</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>дзе</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__і/дзём">
        <e><p><l>дзём</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>дзяце</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>дуць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__х/одзіш">
        <e><p><l>дзіш</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>дзіць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__х/одзім">
        <e><p><l>дзім</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>дзяць</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/быць__vbser">
      <e><p><l>быць</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>буду</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>будзеш</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>будзе</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>будзем</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>будзеце</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>будуць</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ёсць</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ёсць</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ёсць</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ёсць</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ёсць</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ёсць</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>бы</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

      <e><p><l>будзем</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>будзь</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>няма</l><r>быць<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="е/сць__vblex_impf_tv"> <!-- TODO: даць -->
      <e><p><l>сць</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ем</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яci</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>есць</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__я/дзім"/></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ж</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="з'е/сць__vblex_perf_tv"> <!-- TODO: аддаць -->
      <e><p><l>сць</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ем</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яci</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>есць</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__я/дзім"/></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ж</l><r>сць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="да/ваць__vblex_impf_tv">
      <e><p><l>ваць</l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ючы</l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/ю"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__да/ём"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

      <e><p><l>вай</l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="быць"><i></i><par n="/быць__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="даваць"><i>да</i><par n="да/ваць__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="з'есць"><i>з'е</i><par n="з'е/сць__vblex_perf_tv"/></e>
